Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
CHAPTER 2 Georgia Ports Authority

Law reviews.

For article, “Public Authorities: Legislative Panacea?,” see 5 J. of Pub. L. 387 (1956).

For article noting the exclusion of public authorities from the Georgia Administrative Procedure Act, see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 269 (1965).

52-2-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Georgia Ports Authority Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 1.

52-2-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Authority” means the Georgia Ports Authority created by Code Section 52-2-4.

“Bonds” or “revenue bonds” means any bonds issued by the authority under this chapter, including refunding bonds.

“Cost of the project” means the cost of acquisition and construction, the cost of all lands, properties, rights, easements, and franchises acquired, the cost of all machinery and equipment, financing charges, interest prior to and during construction or installation and for up to three years after completion of construction or installation, cost of engineering, architectural, and legal expenses and of plans and specifications and other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project, administrative expense, the costs of establishing and maintaining any necessary funds and reserve funds with respect to the financing or operation of any project, and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing herein authorized, including the fees and costs of trustees, paying agents, remarketing agents, and other fiscal agents, costs of bond insurance, letter of credit fees, reimbursement agreement fees, and other loan, credit enhancement, or guarantee fees and, to the completion of construction or installation of any project, the placing of the same in operation, and the condemnation of property necessary for such construction, installation, and operation.

“Harbor” includes any place natural or artificial in which vessels capable of moving articles of commerce on water may be loaded, unloaded, or accommodated.

“Port” and “seaport” include any place natural or artificial in which seagoing vessels may be sheltered or loaded or unloaded.

“Project” includes wharves, docks, ships, piers, quays, elevators, cranes, cargo handling equipment, computer hardware and software, technology, compresses, refrigeration storage plants, and warehouses and may include buildings and facilities or equipment and machinery to be used in the manufacturing, processing, assembling, storing, or handling of any cargo, agricultural or manufactured produce or products or produce and products of mining or industry, if the use and operation thereof, in the judgment of the authority, will result in the increased use of port facilities, the development of the system of state docks, or, in connection therewith, promote the agricultural, industrial, and natural resources of this state; provided, however, that no such building or facility shall be constructed by the authority unless the building or facility is located on or in the environs of property in which the authority has an interest. Any project may include other structures and any and all facilities needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce, including the dredging of harbors and approaches thereto and the construction of belt-line railroads, railroad sidings, roads, highways, bridges, causeways, and approaches, necessary or useful in connection therewith, and shipping facilities and transportation facilities incident thereto and useful or convenient for the use thereof, including terminal railroads, and also airports, seaplane bases, and air transportation terminals. There may be included as a part of any project any public utility facilities necessary or desirable to supply public utility services to other parts of such project or to the users of any of the facilities of the authority, which public utility facilities may include, without limitation, facilities for the supplying of electricity, gas, and water and for the collection and disposal of storm and sanitary sewage. There may be included as part of any project all appurtenances, equipment, and machinery of every kind and nature necessary or desirable for the full utilization of the project.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 3; Ga. L. 1946, p. 60, § 2; Ga. L. 1949, p. 778, § 4; Ga. L. 1963, p. 342, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 88, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 897, § 1/HB 1060.

52-2-3.
Projects which may be considered self-liquidating; lease or sale of manufacturing or processing facilities; inclusion in projects of leased facilities and facilities acquired for use as ports.

Any project shall be deemed self-liquidating if, in the judgment of the authority, the revenues and earnings of the authority or of the project or from the terminal or facilities of which the project shall become a part will be sufficient to pay the cost of constructing, maintaining, repairing, and operating the project and to pay the principal and interest of revenue bonds which may be issued for the cost of such project. Any buildings or facilities acquired by the authority under this chapter which are to be utilized in the manufacturing, processing, assembling, storing, or handling of any agricultural or manufactured produce or products or produce and products of mining or industry, which may be acquired by the authority for operation by a corporation, entity, or persons other than the authority, as distinguished from facilities acquired by the authority for operation by it as a port and allied facilities for the direct use of the public, shall be acquired and financed under this chapter only if, prior to the issuance of bonds therefor, the authority shall have entered into a lease or leases thereof or an agreement or agreements for the sale thereof pursuant to the terms of which the lessees or purchasers shall pay to the authority such rentals or installment purchase payments, or both, as upon the basis of determinations and findings to be made by the authority will be fully sufficient to pay principal of and interest on the bonds issued by the financing thereof, to build up and maintain any reserves deemed by the authority to be advisable in connection therewith, and to pay the cost of maintaining the buildings and facilities in good repair and of keeping them properly insured, unless the leases or agreements obligate the lessees or purchasers to pay for such insurance or maintenance. The authority is given full power and discretion to enter into any such agreements or leases as may in its judgment be desirable for the best interests of the authority. Any such agreement or lease may provide that any surplus capacity of the buildings or facilities which are the subject matter thereof may be utilized by and for the benefit of the general public, in which event, such surplus capacity may be maintained or operated, or both, by either the authority or by the lessee or purchaser under the lease or agreement, or in part by each, all as may be provided in the lease or agreement. Any project may include in part one or more buildings or facilities or combinations thereof to be leased or sold as provided in this Code section and in part other facilities described in paragraph (6) of Code Section 52-2-2, the revenues of the whole being allocated and pledged to the financing of the project as a whole; and in such event, the requirements of this Code section applicable to buildings or facilities to be leased or sold shall be applicable only to the part of the project which consists of the buildings or facilities to be so leased or sold.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 3; Ga. L. 1946, p. 60, § 2; Ga. L. 1963, p. 342, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 897, § 2/HB 1060.

52-2-4.
Creation of authority; status of authority as an instrumentality of state and a public corporation.

There is created a body corporate and politic, to be known as the Georgia Ports Authority, which shall be deemed to be an instrumentality of the State of Georgia and a public corporation; and by that name, style, and title the authority may contract and be contracted with, sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in all courts.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 2; Ga. L. 1949, p. 778, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 120, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 457, § 2.

52-2-5.
Composition of authority; appointment, terms, and qualifications of members generally; filling of vacancies; election of chairperson, vice chairperson, and secretary-treasurer; quorum.

The authority shall consist of 12 members to be appointed by the Governor from the state at large.

The nine members of the authority in office immediately prior to May 1, 2000, shall serve out the remainder of the terms for which they were appointed, all of such terms expiring on June 30 of the year of expiration. In addition to said nine members, the Governor shall appoint three members for terms to expire June 30, 2004. The director of the Office of Planning and Budget or his or her designee as approved by the Governor shall serve as an ex officio member of the authority.

Successors to the members referred to in subsection (b) of this Code section and future successors shall each be appointed for a term of four years, which term shall begin on the day following the expiration of the term of office of the member such person is appointed to succeed. Any member of the authority shall be eligible for reappointment. Any person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The authority shall elect one of its members as chairperson and another member as vice chairperson and shall also elect a secretary-treasurer who shall not necessarily be a member of the authority.

Seven members of the authority shall constitute a quorum. No vacancy on the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 120, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 457, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 945, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1014, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1588, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 52.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “May 1, 2000,” was substituted for “the effective date of this Act” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

52-2-6.
Compensation of members and reimbursement for expenses.

The members of the authority shall be compensated in the amount of $40.00 per day, plus actual expenses incurred, for each day’s service spent in the performance of the duties of the authority. Such compensation shall be limited to 150 days for the chairman and 60 days for each of the other members of the authority during any one fiscal year.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 120, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 150, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 457, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1383, § 1.

Cross references.

Compensation of members of public agencies, § 45-7-6.

52-2-7.
Making of rules and regulations; delegation of powers and duties; perpetual existence of authority.

The authority shall make necessary rules and regulations for its own government. The authority may delegate to one or more of its members or to its officials, agents, or employees such powers and duties as it may deem proper. The authority shall have perpetual existence.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 2; Ga. L. 1949, p. 778, § 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 120, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 457, § 2.

52-2-8.
Eligibility for membership.

No person shall be eligible for membership on the Georgia Ports Authority who shall also be at the time of appointment or who shall thereafter become a member of any local port authority of any city, town, county, or district.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 778, § 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 120, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 457, § 2.

52-2-9.
Powers of authority generally.

The authority shall have the following powers:

To have a seal and alter the same at pleasure;

To acquire, hold, and dispose of personal property for its corporate purposes;

To acquire in its own name by purchase, on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper, or by condemnation in accordance with and subject to any and all existing laws applicable to the condemnation of property for public use, real property or rights of easements therein or franchises necessary or convenient for its corporate purposes and to use the same so long as its corporate existence shall continue and to lease or make contracts with respect to the use of or to dispose of the same in any manner it deems to the best advantage of the authority. The authority shall be under no obligation to accept and pay for any property condemned under this chapter, except from the funds provided under the authority of this chapter. In any proceedings to condemn, such orders may be made by the court having jurisdiction of the suit, action, or proceeding as may be just to the authority and to the owners of the property to be condemned. No property shall be acquired under this chapter upon which any lien or other encumbrance exists unless at the time the property is so acquired a sufficient sum of money is deposited in trust to pay and redeem the lien or encumbrance in full; provided, however, that nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit the authority from acquiring property, real or personal, tangible or intangible, from the Brunswick Port Authority as otherwise authorized under this chapter and the laws of this state; and, if the authority deems it expedient to construct any project on lands the title to which then is in the State of Georgia, the Governor is authorized to convey, for and in behalf of the state, title to such lands to the authority upon payment to the Office of the State Treasurer for the credit of the general fund of the state treasury of the reasonable value of such lands, such value to be determined by three appraisers to be agreed upon by the Governor and the chairperson of the authority;

To appoint and select officers, agents, and employees, including engineering, architectural, and construction experts and attorneys, and to fix their compensation;

To make contracts and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient, including contracts for acquisition, construction, and installation of projects and leases of projects or contracts with respect to the use of projects which it causes to be erected or acquired, and to make such contracts and leases with the state, state institutions, and departments and agencies of the state; rentals under leases with the state or any department, agency, or institution of the state shall be paid as provided in the lease contracts from funds appropriated for such purposes by the terms of the Constitution of this state or from any other funds lawfully available;

To construct, erect, acquire, own, repair, remodel, maintain, add to, extend, improve, equip, operate, and manage projects, as defined in paragraph (6) of Code Section 52-2-2, to be located on property owned by the authority, the cost of any such project to be paid from the proceeds of revenue bonds or other obligations of the authority or from such proceeds and any grant from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof;

To accept loans and grants, either or both, of money or materials or property of any kind from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof upon such terms and conditions as the United States of America or such agency or instrumentality may impose and to comply with such terms and conditions; including but not limited to the power to provide indemnification on behalf of the authority or any other agency or instrumentality of the state if such other agency or instrumentality be an equal participant with the authority as a nonfederal sponsor of a congressionally authorized civil works project for the benefit of the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof, which power has existed since the creation of the authority;

To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes and to issue negotiable revenue bonds payable from earnings of such projects and to provide for the payment of the same and for the rights of the holders thereof;

To exercise any power usually possessed by private corporations performing similar functions which is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of this state;

To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this chapter;

To act as agent for the United States of America or any agency, department, corporation, or instrumentality thereof in any matter coming within the purposes or powers of the authority;

To adopt, alter, or repeal its own bylaws, rules, and regulations governing the manner in which its business may be transacted and in which the power granted to it may be enjoyed, as the authority may deem necessary or expedient in facilitating its business;

To do any and all other acts and things in this chapter authorized or required to be done, whether or not included in the general powers mentioned in this Code section;

To receive gifts, donations, or contributions from any person, firm, or corporation;

To contract with any municipality or county for the leasing, operation, or management of real or personal property in or adjacent to any seaport of this state;

To develop and improve the harbors or seaports of this state for the handling of waterborne commerce from and to any part of this state and other states and foreign countries;

To acquire, construct, equip, maintain, develop, and improve said harbors or seaports and their port facilities;

To foster and stimulate the shipment of freight and commerce through such ports, whether originating within or without this state, including the investigation and handling of matters pertaining to all transportation rates and rate structures affecting the same;

To own, lease, and operate tug boats, locomotives, and any and every kind of character of motive power and conveyances or appliances necessary or proper to carry passengers, goods, wares, merchandise, or articles of commerce in, on, or around its projects;

To hold, use, administer, and expend such sum or sums as may hereafter be appropriated by authority of the General Assembly for any of the purposes of the authority;

To do any other things necessary or proper to foster or encourage the commerce, domestic or foreign, of the state, of the United States of America, or of the several sister states; and

To appoint and select employees designated as security guards who shall have a limited power to make arrests for certain offenses committed on any property under the jurisdiction of the Georgia Ports Authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 4; Ga. L. 1963, p. 342, § 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1640, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 52; Ga. L. 1988, p. 254, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296; Ga. L. 2010, p. 897, § 3/HB 1060; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1, § 2/SB 5; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 52/HB 737.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, a semicolon was substituted for a period at the end of paragraph (5).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 1, § 1/SB 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act is enacted pursuant to Article III, Section VI, Paragraph II(a)(3) of the Constitution of Georgia.”

52-2-10.
Applicability of traffic laws; enforcement by peace officers; traffic citations; issuance of bench warrant upon failure of offender to appear; enforcement of dock related city ordinances; venue.

The motor vehicle traffic laws for this state shall apply to all roads within the jurisdiction of the Georgia Ports Authority; provided, however, that the authority may determine and declare reasonable, safe, and lawful speed limits on all roads within its jurisdiction.

Those regular employees of the Georgia Ports Authority designated as peace officers shall have the power to arrest for traffic offenses committed on any property under the jurisdiction of the Georgia Ports Authority.

Such arrest may be effected by issuance of a citation, provided the offense is committed in the presence of the arresting peace officer.

A citation issued by a peace officer shall enumerate the specific charges against the offender and the date on which the offender is to appear and answer the charges.

If the offender fails to appear as specified in the citation, the judge having jurisdiction of the offense may issue a warrant ordering the apprehension of such person and commanding that he or she be brought before the court to answer the charges contained in the citation and the charge of his or her failure to appear as required. The person shall be allowed to make a reasonable bond to appear on a given date before the court.

Peace officers shall be subject to Chapter 13 of Title 40, relating to uniform traffic citation and complaint forms.

Peace officers of the Georgia Ports Authority may arrest for violations of dock related city ordinances where applicable.

All powers of arrest granted in this Code section shall exist only on property under the jurisdiction of the Georgia Ports Authority or while in hot pursuit of one whom the peace officer observed commit an offense within the jurisdiction of the authority as provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section.

All offenders apprehended for offenses committed within the jurisdiction of the Georgia Ports Authority shall be tried by the appropriate city, county, or state tribunal.

All peace officers of the Georgia Ports Authority shall be subject to the requirements of Chapter 8 of Title 35, the “Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Act.”

While in the performance of their duties, peace officers of the Georgia Ports Authority shall have the same powers of arrest and the same powers to enforce law and order as the sheriff of the county and the chief of police of the county or municipality in this state wherein any such peace officer is performing his or her duty. While in the performance of their duties, any such peace officers shall be authorized to exercise such powers and duties as are authorized by law for members of the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety. Such peace officers shall be subject to the requirements of Chapter 8 of Title 35, the “Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Act,” and are specifically required to complete the training required for peace officers by that chapter.

While in the performance of their duties, peace officers of the Georgia Ports Authority shall have the right to issue citations to vehicles parked in areas not specifically designated for the parking of vehicles while on the properties of the Georgia Ports Authority’s terminals. The issuance of any such parking citation shall require the person who parked said vehicle to respond by the payment of a fine in the amount of $25.00 or by appearing in the court which handles misdemeanor traffic offenses for the county in which the terminal is located, in which event the amount of the fine shall be fixed at the discretion of the judge of said court, but in no event shall the fine exceed $25.00. In addition to the right to issue parking citations, peace officers of the Georgia Ports Authority shall have the right to remove improperly parked cars or vehicles in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 44-1-13.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 1640, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 503, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 52; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 52; Ga. L. 1994, p. 879, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 52; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1141, § 1/HB 958.

Cross references.

Exercise of power of arrest generally, T. 17, C. 4.

Rules of the road, T. 40, C. 6.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1141, § 2/HB 958, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part: “this Act shall not apply to persons hired by the Georgia Ports Authority for security purposes on March 18, 1991, or August 8, 1997. The provisions of Code Section 52-2-10 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated in effect at the time that this Act is adopted shall continue to apply to such persons.”

52-2-11.
Power of authority to borrow money, to execute evidences of indebtedness, and to secure such indebtedness; sale and other disposition of property; utilization of proceeds of sale.

The Georgia Ports Authority shall have and may exercise the following powers:

The authority may borrow money for its corporate purposes and may execute and deliver long-term and short-term notes, commercial paper, bond anticipation notes, and other obligations or evidences of indebtedness therefor and may secure such indebtedness in such manner as the authority may provide by its resolution authorizing the indebtedness to be incurred, provided that the authority shall not pledge to the payment of the indebtedness revenue pledged to the payment of any other indebtedness then outstanding or encumber property in violation of the terms of any existing contract, agreement, or trust indenture securing existing indebtedness.

The authority may from time to time sell or otherwise dispose of surplus personal property and may sell or otherwise dispose of land and any improvements thereon acquired by the authority pursuant to law and which the authority may determine is not required for port or warehouse operations or for the future expansion and improvement of the state system of docks, including property which is suitable for industrial development. Any such property may be sold, leased, or otherwise disposed of upon such terms and conditions as may be provided by resolution of the authority. The proceeds of any such sale shall be used by the authority for the purposes provided by law. However, any sale of land or leasing of same and mortgaging of same or conveying the same as security for a loan as provided under this Code section shall be first approved in writing by the Governor, the state auditor, and the Attorney General.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 714, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 52; Ga. L. 2010, p. 897, § 4/HB 1060.

52-2-12.
Funds for acquisition of land and construction of port facilities.

The Governor may make available to the Georgia Ports Authority for the purpose of acquiring necessary lands, including improvements thereon, as well as for constructing buildings, terminals, and other port facilities, any funds appropriated for the construction of port facilities. Any land so acquired shall be conveyed to the Georgia Ports Authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 714, § 2.

52-2-13.
Approval and consent of State Properties Commission for acquisition of real property by authority.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the authority shall not purchase any real property without the approval and consent of the State Properties Commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 714, § 2A.

Cross references.

Acquisition of real property by state agencies generally, §

50-16-30

et seq.

52-2-14.
Conveyance of Medical Depot site to authority; power to sell conveyed surplus lands and improvements; power to borrow and to issue revenue anticipation certificates.

The Governor of this state is authorized to convey, for and in behalf of the state, title to lands and improvements known as the Medical Depot site in Chatham County, Georgia, adjacent to the Savannah River. For a more particular description, reference is made to the deed conveying the site from the State of Georgia to the Georgia Ports Authority upon payment of such nominal sum to the Office of the State Treasurer as may be agreed upon by the Governor and the authority. The authority shall have the power to sell any portions of land or improvements, or both, thus conveyed as are not required for port or warehouse operations or for the future expansion or improvement of the operation of a system of state docks, provided that any moneys received incident to such sales shall be utilized by the authority for the further expansion, construction, and improvement of the existing facilities located at the Medical Depot site in Chatham County on the Savannah River. The authority is empowered to borrow money on the existing facilities as described in this Code section and to issue revenue anticipation certificates to be retired from the revenue derived from the described facilities. All such sums, whether borrowed or secured through the sale of revenue anticipation certificates, shall be used for the exclusive purpose of developing a system of state docks at the site of the Medical Depot described in this Code section or for the purchase of necessary and essential equipment to be located thereon, or both, and for any and all purposes deemed necessary, essential, and expedient for the purpose of developing the site as a part of a system of state docks.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 778, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 52; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.

52-2-15.
Revenue bonds — Issuance; payment of principal and interest from special fund; dating of bonds; determination of rate of interest; time of maturity; redemption before maturity.

The authority shall have the power and is authorized at one time or from time to time to provide by resolution for the issuance of negotiable revenue bonds of the authority for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost as defined in this chapter of any one or more projects. The principal and interest of such revenue bonds shall be payable solely from the special fund provided in this chapter for such payment. The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at the lowest rate obtainable by negotiation or, if the authority deems it necessary, by the taking of competitive bids, payable as determined by the authority at time of issue, shall mature at such time or times as the authority may determine at the time of issue, shall be payable in such medium of payment as to both principal and interest as may be determined by the authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 5; Ga. L. 1949, p. 778, § 3; Ga. L. 1963, p. 342, § 4; Ga. L. 1974, p. 589, § 1.

Cross references.

Revenue bonds generally, §

36-82-60

et seq.

52-2-16.
Revenue bonds — Form of bonds; denominations; place of payment of principal and interest.

The authority shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places for payment of principal and interest thereof, which may be at any bank or trust company within or outside the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 5.

52-2-17.
Revenue bonds — Signatures; seal.

In case any officer whose signature appears on any bonds or whose facsimile signature appears on any coupons ceases to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds, such signature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until the delivery. All such bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the authority and the official seal of the authority shall be affixed thereto and attested by the secretary-treasurer of the authority and any coupons attached thereto shall bear the facsimile signature of the chairman of the authority. Any coupon may bear the facsimile signature of such person and any bond may be signed, sealed, and attested on behalf of the authority by such persons as at the actual time of the execution of such bonds shall be duly authorized or hold the proper office, although at the date of the bond such persons may not have been so authorized or shall not have held such office.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 5.

52-2-18.
Revenue bonds — Status of bonds as negotiable instruments; tax exemption for bonds and for income therefrom.

All revenue bonds issued under this chapter shall have and are declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the negotiable instruments laws of the state. Such bonds and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation within the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 5.

52-2-19.
Revenue bonds — Issuance in coupon, registered, or book-entry form.

The bonds may be issued in coupon, registered, or book-entry form, as the authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bond as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 5; Ga. L. 2010, p. 897, § 5/HB 1060.

52-2-20.
Revenue bonds — Determination of price; use and manner of disbursement of proceeds; procedure where proceeds are less than or greater than cost of projects.

The authority may sell such bonds in such manner and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interests of the authority. The proceeds of the bonds shall be used solely for the payment of the costs of the project or projects and shall be disbursed upon requisition or order of the chairman of the authority under such restrictions, if any, as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust indenture hereinafter mentioned in this chapter may provide. If the proceeds of the bonds, by error of calculation or otherwise, shall be less than the cost of the project or projects, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of the deficit, which, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust indenture, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same purpose. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the amount required for the purpose for which the bonds are issued, the surplus shall be paid into the fund hereinafter provided for the payment of principal and interest of such bonds.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 5; Ga. L. 1974, p. 589, § 1.

52-2-21.
Revenue bonds — Issuance of interim receipts, interim certificates, and temporary bonds; replacement of mutilated, destroyed, or lost bonds.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts, interim certificates, or temporary bonds, with or without coupons exchangeable for definitive bonds upon the issuance of the latter. The authority may also provide for the replacement of any bond which shall become mutilated or be destroyed or lost.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 5.

52-2-22.
Revenue bonds — Conditions precedent to issuance; application of bonds of a single issue to payment of one or more projects; effective date of resolutions providing for issuance; passage of resolutions.

Such revenue bonds may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, and things which are specified or required by this chapter. In the discretion of the authority, revenue bonds in a single issue may be issued for the purpose of paying the costs of any one or more projects. Any resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds under this chapter shall become effective immediately upon its passage and need not be published or posted and any such resolution may be passed at any regular or special or adjourned meeting of the authority by a majority of its members.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 5.

52-2-23.
Revenue bonds — Aid by Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission.

Whenever the authority determines to issue its bonds or other obligations, it shall obtain the approval of the Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission and otherwise comply with the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 17 of Title 50, the “Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 874, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 897, § 6/HB 1060.

52-2-24.
Revenue bonds — Status of bonds as a debt of state or a pledge of faith and credit of state; issuance as obligating state to levy tax or make appropriation; obligation to pay principal and interest on bonds; recitals on face of bonds.

Revenue bonds issued under this chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the State of Georgia or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state, but such bonds shall be payable solely from the fund provided in this chapter therefor from earnings. The issuance of such revenue bonds shall not directly or indirectly or contingently obligate the state to levy or to pledge any form of taxation whatever therefor from earnings; and the issuance of such revenue bonds shall not directly or indirectly or contingently obligate the state to levy or to pledge any form of taxation whatever therefor or to make any appropriation for their payment. Neither the state nor the authority shall be obligated to pay the principal of or the interest on such revenue bonds except from earnings of the project or projects for which they shall be issued. All such revenue bonds shall contain recitals on their face covering the foregoing provisions of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 6.

52-2-25.
Revenue bonds — Securing of bonds by trust indenture.

In the discretion of the authority, any issue of such revenue bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside of the state. Such trust indenture may pledge or assign revenues and earnings to be received. Either the resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds or the trust indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the acquisition of property, the construction of the project, the maintenance, operation, repair, and insurance of the project, and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys; may also provide that any project shall be constructed and paid for under the supervision and approval of consulting engineers or architects employed or designated by the authority and satisfactory to the original purchasers of the bonds issued therefor; may also require that the security given by contractors and by any depositary of the proceeds of the bonds or revenues or other moneys be satisfactory to the purchasers; and may also contain provisions concerning the conditions, if any, upon which additional revenue bonds may be issued. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state to act as such depositary and to furnish such indemnifying bonds or pledge such securities as may be required by the authority. The indenture may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee and may restrict the individual right of action of bondholders as is customary in trust indentures securing bonds and debentures of corporations. In addition to the foregoing, the trust indenture may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the trust indenture may be treated as a part of the cost of maintenance, operation, and repair of the project or projects affected by the indenture.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 464, § 8.